Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF15.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1326YH (3) 91 jda/jh H.F. 15 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 256.20 Rural attorney recruitment 1 assistance program ââ fund. 2 1. Program created. The department may establish a program 3 to assist rural counties and municipalities in recruiting 4 attorneys. 5 2. Application. Each interested county or municipality 6 must apply to the department to be included in the rural 7 attorney recruitment assistance program. Before making a 8 determination of eligibility, the department shall conduct 9 a county or municipality assessment designed to evaluate 10 the countyâs or municipalityâs need for an attorney and the 11 countyâs or municipalityâs ability to sustain and support an 12 attorney. The department shall maintain a list of counties and 13 municipalities that have been assessed and are eligible for 14 participation in the program. The department may revise any 15 county or municipality assessment or conduct a new assessment 16 as necessary to reflect any change in conditions within a 17 county or municipality. 18 3. County or municipality eligible to participate. A county 19 or municipality is eligible to participate in the program if 20 all of the following are true: 21 a. The county or municipality has a population of less than 22 twenty-six thousand and is located more than twenty miles from 23 a city with a population of at least fifty thousand, based on 24 the 2020 federal decennial census. 25 b. The county or municipality agrees to provide the countyâs 26 or municipalityâs portion of the incentive payment pursuant 27 to the provisions of this section. Such payments shall be in 28 addition to the advertised salary and benefits of the attorney 29 position. 30 c. The department determines the county or municipality is 31 eligible. 32 4. Incentive payment to participating attorneys. Any 33 attorney who is selected to enter into an agreement and who, in 34 conjunction with the eligible county or municipality, fulfills 35 -1- LSB 1326YH (3) 91 jda/jh 1/ 5 H.F. 15 the requirements of the program is entitled to receive an 1 incentive payment in five equal annual installments, each in 2 an amount equal to ninety percent of the annual university of 3 Iowa college of law resident tuition and fees as determined on 4 July 1, 2025. 5 5. Agreement for payment of recruitment assistance. 6 a. Any agreement for the payment of recruitment assistance 7 pursuant to this section must obligate the rural county or 8 municipality served by the attorney to provide thirty-five 9 percent of the total amount of the incentive payments in 10 five equal annual installments. After the rural county or 11 municipality certifies to the department that the county 12 or municipality has paid the attorney the required amount, 13 the department shall pay to the attorney the remaining 14 balance. The department shall pay the required amount out of 15 moneys appropriated pursuant to this section. A county or 16 municipality may prepay its portion of the incentive payments 17 at any time during the five-year period. The department shall 18 only pay upon completion of each annual employment obligation. 19 b. The agreement must require the attorney to become a 20 contract attorney with the office of the state public defender 21 and agree to participate in volunteer lawyer projects through 22 nonprofit organizations providing critical legal assistance to 23 low-income and vulnerable Iowans. 24 6. County and municipality funding. Any eligible county 25 or municipality may appropriate moneys for the purpose of 26 carrying out the provisions of this section. An eligible 27 county or municipality may enter an agreement with any county, 28 municipality, school district, or nonprofit entity to assist 29 the county or municipality in carrying out the provisions of 30 this section. 31 7. Filing and approval of recruitment assistance 32 agreement. A recruitment assistance agreement entered into 33 pursuant to this section is not effective until it is filed 34 with and approved by the department. The agreement must 35 -2- LSB 1326YH (3) 91 jda/jh 2/ 5 H.F. 15 provide that the attorney practice law full-time in the 1 eligible county or municipality for at least five years. 2 8. Ineligibility for participation in other programs. A 3 person shall not participate in the program if the person has 4 previously participated in the program, or any other state or 5 federal scholarship, loan repayment, or tuition reimbursement 6 program that obligates the person to provide attorney services 7 within an underserved area. 8 9. Fund established. A rural attorney recruitment 9 assistance program fund is created in the state treasury under 10 the control of the department. The department may accept 11 gifts, grants, bequests, and other private contributions, as 12 well as state or federal moneys, for deposit in the fund. The 13 department shall remit all repayments made pursuant to this 14 section to the fund. All moneys deposited or paid into the 15 fund are appropriated to the department to be used for meeting 16 the requirements of this section and increasing the number of 17 attorneys participating in the program. During a fiscal year, 18 up to five percent of the moneys in the fund may be used by the 19 department to cover implementation and administration costs 20 associated with this section. Notwithstanding section 8.33, 21 moneys in the fund that remain unencumbered or unobligated 22 at the close of a fiscal year shall not revert but shall 23 remain available for expenditure for the purposes designated. 24 Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2, interest or 25 earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund. 26 10. Rules. The state board shall adopt rules to administer 27 this section. 28 11. Limitation. The program shall not provide assistance 29 for more than five attorneys. This subsection is repealed July 30 1, 2026. 31